Washington statutes.
RCW 35.58.030

Corporations authorized—Limitation on boundaries.

Any area of the state containing two or more cities, at least one of which is of ten thousand or more population, may organize as a metropolitan municipal corporation for the performance of certain functions, as provided in this chapter. The boundaries of a metropolitan municipal corporation may not be expanded to include territory located in a county other than a component county except as a result of the consolidation of two or more contiguous metropolitan municipal corporations.

[ 1993 c 240 s 1; 1965 c 7 s 35.58.030. Prior: 1957 c 213 s 3.]

NOTES:

Inclusion of code cities in metropolitan municipal corporations: Chapter 35A.57 RCW.